Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 3. Disposition of Records of Justices [Repealed]

§§ 5-4-301 through 5-4-305.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This article, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, §§ 188 though 190, and 193 and 194, pertained to the disposition of the records of justices.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.